Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-110
National Guard; uniform; arms; equipment.

The National Guard of Nebraska shall be uniformed, armed and equipped as provided by the laws or regulations of the United States. Such uniforms, arms and equipment shall be procured and issued by the proper officers as the needs of the service may require and shall be accounted for as the regulations may prescribe.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 17, p. 661;

C.S.1929, § 55-122;

R.S.1943, § 55-112;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 8, p. 1584.